Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 125A.81, is amended to read: 125A.81 SPECIAL EDUCATION SEPARATE SITES AND PROGRAMS AID. Subdivision 1. Definition. For purposes of this section, "special education separate site and program" means a public separate day school facility attended by students with disabilities for 50 percent or more of their school day. Subd. 2. Eligibility for special education separate sites and programs aid. An education cooperative under section 471.59, education district under section 123A.15, service cooperative under section 123A.21, deleted text begin ordeleted text end intermediate school district under section 136D.01new text begin , or a school district site approved under subdivision 2anew text end qualifies for additional state funding to special education separate sites and programs for every kindergarten through grade 12 child with a disability, as defined in section 125A.02, served in a special education separate site or program as defined in subdivision 1. new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin School district sites. new text end new text begin A school district that operates a school site meeting the definition of a special education separate site and program under subdivision 1 may apply to the commissioner for funding eligibility. The district must provide information about its program in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end Subd. 3. Uses of special education separate sites and programs aid. Additional state funding to special education separate sites and programs under this section may be used for the same purposes as are permitted for state special education aid under section 125A.76. Subd. 4. Special education separate sites and programs aid. deleted text begin For fiscal year 2024 and later,deleted text end Additional state funding to special education separate sites and programs equals $1,689 times the adjusted kindergarten through grade 12 pupil units served in special education separate sites and programs under subdivision 1. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aid for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; SPECIAL EDUCATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Special education separate sites and programs. new text end new text begin (a) For aid for special education separate sites and programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 125A.81, subdivision 4: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The 2026 appropriation includes $....... for fiscal year 2025 and $....... for fiscal year 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The 2027 appropriation includes $....... for fiscal year 2026 and $....... for fiscal year 2027. new text end